Washington statutes.
RCW 6.36.130

Sale under levy.

Sale under the levy may be held at any time after final judgment, either personal or QUASI IN REM, but not earlier except as otherwise provided by law for sale under levy on perishable goods. Sale and distribution of the proceeds shall be made in accordance with the law of this state.

[ 1953 c 191 s 13.]